trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
    <pardef n="th/is__det">

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ese</l>
          <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="th/at__det">

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ose</l>
          <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="second__det">

      
                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

 </pardef>


    <pardef n="many__det">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="much__det">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="enough__det">
     
 
                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 
                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      
    </pardef>


   <pardef n="what__det">

     
                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      
                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="how_many__det">


                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="how_much__det">


                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>



    <pardef n="all__predet">

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


   <pardef n="at__pr">

      
                              <e>
	<p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="pr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>




<pardef n="mine__prn">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>



                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

</pardef>



    <pardef n="everyone__prn">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="something__prn">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="th/is__prn">

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ese</l>
          <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="th/at__prn">

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ose</l>
          <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>



    <pardef n="both__prn">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="all__prn">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="the_other__prn">
      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="what__prn">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="which_one__prn">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="how_many__prn">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="how_much__prn">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

     <pardef n="whose__prn">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


        
 <pardef n="what__rel">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="those_who__rel">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="that__rel">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="where__rel">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="'s__gen">

                          <e>
    <p>
      <l/>
      <r><s n="gen"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>

</pardef>

<e lm=oni"><i>oni</i><par n="everyone__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la lia"><i>la<b/>lia</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la mia"><i>la<b/>mia</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la nia"><i>la<b/>nia</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la ilia"><i>la<b/>ilia</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la via"><i>la<b/>via</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el"><i>el</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tiel ke"><i>tiel<b/>ke</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tuj poste"><i>tuj<b/>poste</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="en konsento kun"><i>en<b/>konsento<b/>kun</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sed"><i>sed</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="al"><i>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="krom ol"><i>krom<b/>ol</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="antaŭ ol"><i>antaŭ<b/>ol</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ne malpli ol"><i>ne<b/>malpli<b/>ol</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="pro"><i>pro</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tra"><i>tra</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="contraŭ"><i>contraŭ</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="super"><i>super</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="malantaŭ"><i>malantaŭ</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ĉe"><i>ĉe</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="escepte"><i>escepte</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="kune"><i>kune</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="spite"><i>spite</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="inter"><i>inter</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ĝis"><i>ĝis</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="inkluzive de"><i>inkluzive<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="malgraŭ"><i>malgraŭ</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="pli"><i>pli</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="por"><i>por</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="pro"><i>pro</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="proksimune"><i>proksimune<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sen"><i>sen</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tra"><i>tra</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="anstataŭ"><i>anstataŭ</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="rilte al"><i>rilte<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="iom pli da"><i>iom<b/>pli<b/>da</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="kiel"><i>kiel</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="kun la celo"><i>kun<b/>la<b/>celo</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ekskluzive de"><i>ekskluzive<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="cele al"><i>cele<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="rilate al"><i>rilate<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="koncerne al"><i>koncerne<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="agnoskante"><i>agnoskante</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="de ĉirkaŭ la mezo de"><i>de<b/>ĉirkaŭ<b/>la<b/>mezo<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="apoge al"><i>apoge<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="surbaze de"><i>surbaze<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="kompare kun"><i>kompare<b/>kun</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="konfome al"><i>konfome<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="akorde kun"><i>akorde<b/>kun</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="koncerne al"><i>koncerne<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="fronte al"><i>fronte<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="koncerne al"><i>koncerne<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="koncerne al"><i>koncerne<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="rilate al"><i>rilate<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="en la mezo de"><i>en<b/>la<b/>mezo<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="rilate al"><i>rilate<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="konsiderante"><i>konsiderante</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="fronte al"><i>fronte<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="apud"><i>apud</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tio, kion asertis"><i>tio,<b/>kion<b/>asertis</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="per multe da"><i>per<b/>multe<b/>da</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="miloj da"><i>miloj<b/>da</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="rilate al"><i>rilate<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="pere de"><i>pere<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="pro timo al"><i>pro<b/>timo<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="koncerne al"><i>koncerne<b/>al</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="laŭ opinio de"><i>laŭ<b/>opinio<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sen helpo de"><i>sen<b/>helpo<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="pretekste de"><i>pretekste<b/>de</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
